Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-4916
Entitlement period, defined.

Entitlement period is ten years, meaning the year after which the required increases in employment and investment were met or exceeded and the next one hundred eight months.

Laws 1995, LB 829, § 16.